Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-233
Consumer; remedies.

Any consumer that suffers a loss or harm as a result of a violation of the Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act may recover actual damages, attorney's fees, court costs, and any other remedies provided by law. The state, on behalf of its residents who have suffered a loss or harm as a result of a violation of the act, may seek actual damages or other remedies provided by law.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2012;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 95.